Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6h,
as amended by Section 2, Chapter 264, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 11-103.6h), is amended to read as follows:
Section 11-103.6h. A. Personal financial literacy education
shall be taught in the public schools of this state. Personal
financial literacy education shall include, but is not be limited
to, the following areas of instruction:
1. Understanding interest, credit card debt, and online
commerce;
2. Rights and responsibilities of renting or buying a home
including:
Req. No. 2490 Page 1

a. down payments, mortgage payments, and variable and
fixed interest rates,
b. various types of mortgage loans, and
c. escrow;
3. Savings and investing;
4. Planning for retirement including individual retirement
accounts (IRAs), plans established under Section 401(k) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and other avenues for
saving and investing for retirement;
5. Bankruptcy;
6. Banking and financial services;
7. Managing a bank account including online banking features;
8. Understanding credit scores, credit reports, and what
factors affect an individual’s credit score;
9. Understanding the Free Application for Federal Student Aid
(FAFSA), loans and borrowing money, including predatory lending and
payday loans;
10. Understanding insurance;
11. Identity fraud and theft;
12. Charitable giving;
13. Understanding the financial impact and consequences of
gambling;
14. Earning an income; and
15. Understanding state and federal income taxes; and
Req. No. 2490 Page 2

16. Understanding how the Federal Reserve System creates
inflation and devalues the dollar. Instruction may include the
reading of and writing assignments related to The Creature from
Jekyll Island: A Second Look at the Federal Reserve by G. Edward
Griffin.
B. Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the
2025-2026 school year, in order to graduate from a public high
school accredited by the State Board of Education with a standard
diploma, students shall fulfill the requirement by satisfactorily
completing a personal financial literacy course or coursework
containing the areas of instruction for personal financial literacy
as provided in subsection A of this section during the tenth,
eleventh, or twelfth grade.
C. Personal financial literacy instruction shall be integrated
into one or more existing courses of study or provided in a one-half
(1/2) unit personal financial literacy course. School districts may
integrate or embed personal financial literacy instruction within
one or more courses offered by the district to be counted toward
meeting the graduation requirements of this section. Courses
offered at a technology center school through an agreement between
the school district and the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education which integrate or embed personal financial
literacy may, upon the approval of the Board, be counted toward
meeting the graduation requirements of this section. School
Req. No. 2490 Page 3

dist ricts shall have the option of determining if a separate, one-
half (1/2) unit personal financial literacy course will be offered
as an elective, in addition to any courses offered by the school
district or a partnering technology center school which integrate or
embed the required personal financial literacy instruction.
D. Students with the most significant cognitive disabilities
(MSCD) who have an Individualized Education Program individualized
education program (IEP) that directs that the student is to be
assessed with alternate achievements standards through the Oklahoma
Alternative Assessment Program may demonstrate satisfactory
knowledge in each area of instruction listed in subsection A of this
section upon a determination, supported by documentation, by the
school district that the student has met the following criteria:
1. Receives substantive and substantial instruction in life-
skills curriculum; and
2. Demonstrates the acquired knowledge of the student with MSCD
by alternate measures as required by the IEP.
E. The State Board of Education shall identify and adopt
curriculum standards for personal financial literacy instruction
that reflect the areas of instruction listed in subsection A of this
section. The standards shall be incorporated into the state
academic content standards adopted by the Board pursuant to Section
11-103.6 of this title.
F. The State Department of Education shall:
Req. No. 2490 Page 4

1. Develop guidelines and material designed to enable schools
to offer personal financial literacy as a separate course and shall
develop guidelines and material designed to enable schools
flexibility to integrate personal financial literacy within
coursework as determined by the school district. The guidelines
shall outline the areas of instruction to be taught based on the
curriculum standards adopted by the Board;
2. Develop professional development programs that are designed
to help teachers provide instruction in personal financial literacy.
Development programs shall be designed to help teachers provide
instruction through a separate personal financial literacy course.
Professional development shall additionally be designed for teachers
embedding personal financial literacy within their existing subject
matter. Development of a bridge program designed for teachers
seeking to transition from embedded instruction to a separate
personal financial literacy course shall be developed;
3. Provide resources to assist schools in developing a separate
personal financial literacy course and resources for schools seeking
to offer a separate personal financial literacy course. The
Department shall provide support to schools seeking to determine the
most appropriate coursework when embedded instruction is necessary;
4. Provide and identify resources designed to enable students
identified as English language learners and students with specific

Req. No. 2490 Page 5

lear ning disabilities or individual educational needs to understand
and use the personal financial literacy information presented; and
5. Utilize funds deposited into the Personal Financial Literacy
Education Revolving Fund created in Section 11-103.6h-1 of this
title for the purpose of and to fund the Passport to Financial
Literacy Act. Such funds may be used for developing and providing
guidelines, materials, and resources for personal financial literacy
for students and teachers including, but not limited to, online
curricula, training, and professional development for teachers in
the area of personal financial literacy as required in this
subsection. The Department may use such funds to work in
conjunction with one or more Oklahoma-based not-for-profit
organizations based in this state that have proven expertise in the
development of standards and curricula as well as delivery of
teacher professional development in personal financial literacy.
The Department may work with these organizations for the purposes of
developing personal financial literacy standards, curricula, and
guidelines; providing materials and resources; and development of
professional teacher learning programs.
G. 1. For students who transfer into an Oklahoma a school
district in this state from out of state after the tenth grade,
school districts shall assess the knowledge of the student in each
of the areas of instruction listed in subsection A of this section.
If the school district determines that the transferred student has
Req. No. 2490 Page 6

succ essfully completed instruction in the areas of personal
financial literacy instruction at a previous school in which the
student was enrolled or if the student demonstrates satisfactory
knowledge of the areas of personal financial literacy instruction
through an assessment, the school district may exempt the student
from completing instruction in personal financial literacy. School
districts may use the assessment developed and provided by the State
Department of Education or the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education as approved by the Board. School districts may
develop personal financial literacy assessments for transfer
students as provided in this subsection.
2. For students who transfer into an Oklahoma a school district
in this state from out of state during or after their junior year of
high school, school districts may make an exception to the
requirements for a personal financial literacy course pursuant to
the provisions of Section 11-103.6 of this title. School districts
shall still encourage completion of instruction in personal
financial literacy.
H. The State Textbook Committee created in Section 16-101 of
this title may, when selecting textbooks for mathematics, economics,
or similar courses, select those textbooks which contain substantive
provisions on personal finance.
I. School districts may assign the responsibility for teaching
personal financial literacy to teachers with secondary education
Req. No. 2490 Page 7

cert ifications closely related to agricultural education, business
and information technology, economics, family and consumer sciences,
history and social studies, marketing, or mathematics. Upon request
of a school district, the State Department of Education may review a
teacher’s certification to determine qualifications under this
subsection. School districts may assign the responsibility for
teaching personal financial literacy to one teacher or a group of
teachers with appropriate qualifications on a continuing basis.
J. Beginning with the 2020-2021 school year, all teachers who
are assigned the responsibility for teaching personal financial
literacy shall complete ongoing professional development training in
the areas of personal financial literacy instruction in accordance
with guidelines established by the State Department of Education.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-2490 EB 1/15/2026 10:32:41 AM




Req. No. 2490 Page 8